Hawaii statutes.
[§328J‑13]
Public education. The department shall engage in a public education
program to explain and clarify the purposes and requirements of this chapter to
the public, and to guide owners, operators, and managers in their compliance
with it. The program may include but is not limited to publication of a
brochure for affected businesses and individuals explaining this chapter. [L
2006, c 295, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next